Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1761
Collection of taxes; failure to report and pay taxes collected by county treasurer; removal from office.

If any county treasurer fails to account for and settle as required in section 77-1760, his office may be declared vacant by the county board, and the vacancy filled as hereinbefore provided.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 185, p. 456;

R.S.1913, § 6513;

C.S.1922, § 6041;

C.S.1929, § 77-1946;

R.S.1943, § 77-1761.